Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1403.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. Except as provided in subsection E of this section, a
school district shall offer a seminar for parents of students in the
school district that:
a. is offered at no cost to parents,
b. begins at or after 6:00 p.m.,

Req. No. 11249 Page 1

c. is held in at least one school located in the school
district,
d. is offered once a year, and
e. covers the topics described in subsection B of this
section;
2. A school district may develop its own curriculum for the
seminar described in paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section; or
use the curriculum developed by the State Board of Education under
subsection B of this section.
3. A school district shall notify each charter school located
in the attendance boundaries of the school district of the date and
time of the parent seminar, so the charter school may inform parents
of the seminar.
B. The State Board of Education shall:
1. Develop a curriculum for the parent seminar described in
subsection A of this section that includes information on:
a. substance abuse, including illegal drugs and
prescription drugs, and prevention,
b. bullying,
c. mental health, depression, and suicide awareness and
prevention, and
d. Internet safety, including pornography addiction, and
2. Provide the curriculum, including resources and training, to
school districts upon request.
Req. No. 11249 Page 2

C. The State Board of Education shall report to the Legislature
by November 1, 2025, on the progress of implementation of the parent
seminar, including whether a local school board has opted out of
providing the parent seminar, as described in subsection E of this
section, and the reasons why a local school board opted out.
D. The State Board of Education shall report to the Legislature
by July 1, 2026, on the following:
1. The progress of the implementation of the parent seminar;
2. The estimated attendance reported by each school district;
3. A recommendation of whether to continue the parent seminar
program; and
4. If a local school board has opted out of providing the
parent seminar, as described in subsection E of this section, and
the reasons why a local school board opted out.
E. 1. A school district may opt out of offering the parent
seminar if the local school board determines that the topics
described in subsection B of this section are not of significant
interest or value to families in the school district.
2. If a local school board chooses not to offer the parent
seminar in accordance with this subsection, the local school board
shall notify the State Board of Education and provide the reasons
why the local school board chose not to offer the parent seminar.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 11249 Page 3

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11249 SW 01/13/25


















Req. No. 11249 Page 4